Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1305
Retirement board; powers and duties.

The general administration of the retirement system shall be vested in the retirement board. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the State Employees Retirement Act. The board shall maintain records and may employ such assistants and employees as may be necessary to carry out the act.

Laws 1963, c. 532, § 5, p. 1669;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 117, p. 2421;

Laws 1973, LB 498, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 751, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 62;

Laws 1995, LB 369, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 42;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 42.